Tennessee statutes. Title 7 Consolidated Governments and Local Governmental Functions and Entities
Part 2

Creation

7-84-201. Authorized.

The governing body of any municipality of the state is hereby authorized to create by ordinance one (1) or more central business improvement districts in the manner provided in this part.

Acts 1971, ch. 268, § 4; T.C.A., § 6-3904.

Cross-References. Alternative method of establishing and governing district, §7-84-506.

7-84-202. Organization — Procedure — Contents of petition or resolution.

The organization of such a district shall be initiated in either of two (2) methods:

By a petition filed in the office of the clerk of the governing body of the municipality signed by not less than a majority in number of the owners of real property in the district having an assessed value of not less than two thirds (2/3) of the assessed value of all the real property proposed to be included in the district;

After the filing of the petition, no petitioner shall be permitted to withdraw such petitioner's name from the petition;

No petition with the requisite signatures shall be declared void on account of formal or insubstantial defects. The governing body, at any time, may permit the petition to be amended to conform to the facts by correcting any errors in the description of the territory, or in any other particular. Similar petitions for the organization of the same district may be filed and together shall be regarded as one (1) petition with the original. All such petitions filed prior to the hearing on the first petition filed shall be considered by the governing body in the same manner as if filed with the first petition placed on file;

The petition shall set forth:

The name of the proposed district, which shall include the name of the municipality in which the district is to be located, together with the words, “Central Business Improvement District”;

A general description of the boundaries of the district or the territory to be included in the district, identified with sufficient certainty to enable a property owner to determine whether or not such property owner's property is within the district;

A general description of the improvements to be constructed, installed or acquired within and for the district;

The estimated cost of the proposed improvements; and

A prayer for the organization of the district; or

The governing body of a municipality may initiate the organization of a central business improvement district by adoption of a resolution containing the matters prescribed in subdivision (1)(D) for a petition.

Acts 1971, ch. 268, § 5; T.C.A., § 6-3905; Acts 2007, ch. 494, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2007, ch. 494, § 14 provided that the act shall apply to central business improvement districts already in existence and any districts that hereinafter may be created.

7-84-203. Geographical area — Size and form — Property included.

Any central business improvement district created by a municipality may embrace a contiguous property area or two (2) or more separate property areas and may include one (1) or more business districts, which business districts may either be historic business districts or business districts in which additional development and growth is expected to occur, or both, and corridors connecting business districts. Two (2) or more central business improvement districts may overlap and may encompass some or all of the same properties. Each district shall be of such size and form as to include all properties that, in the judgment of the governing body, will be benefited by the construction of the improvement project or projects that are proposed to be made in or for such district, or by any portion or portions of such project. The jurisdiction of a municipality to make, finance, and assess the cost of any improvement project shall not be impaired by a lack of commonness, unity, or singleness of the location, purpose or character of the improvement or improvements, or by the fact that any one (1) or more of the properties included in the district is subsequently determined not to be benefited by such improvement or improvements, or by a particular portion of the improvement or improvements, and is not assessed for the improvement or improvements.

Acts 1971, ch. 268, § 6; T.C.A., § 6-3906; Acts 2007, ch. 494, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2007, ch. 494, § 14 provided that the act shall apply to central business improvement districts already in existence and any districts that hereinafter may be created.

7-84-204. Public hearing to be ordered — When held.

Upon the filing of a petition purporting to contain the requisite number of signatures, or upon the adoption of a resolution by the governing body, the governing body shall order a public hearing to determine whether such central business improvement district shall be established. Such hearing shall be not less than thirty (30) nor more than forty-five (45) days following the adoption of the resolution by the governing body or following the filing of the petition with the governing body.

Acts 1971, ch. 268, § 8; T.C.A., § 6-3908.

7-84-205. Notice of hearing.

Notice of the public hearing shall be given by publishing a notice once a week for three (3) consecutive weeks in some newspaper of general circulation in the municipality. It shall not be necessary to set out in full in such notice the proposed ordinance setting up such central business improvement district, but such notice shall state in summary detail those facts required to be included in the petition as set forth in §7-84-202(1)(D). The notice shall state the time and place of such public hearing, which shall be at least seven (7) days following the date of publication of the third and final notice. Such notice shall also be given by mail to each owner of real property within the proposed district as provided in §7-84-304.

Acts 1971, ch. 268, § 9; T.C.A., § 6-3909.

7-84-206. Hearing on creation of district — Adoption of ordinance.

At the time and place thus appointed, the governing body shall meet, and at such meeting, or at the time and place to which the meeting may be adjourned from time to time, all persons whose property may be affected by such improvement or improvements may appear in person, by attorney or by petition and protest against the creation of such central business improvement district; and the governing body shall consider such objections and protests, if any, and may change the district boundaries or modify the proposal in such manner as may be deemed advisable by the governing body. At the conclusion of such public hearing, the governing body shall adopt, adopt as amended, or reject the organization of such central business improvement district by the adoption or rejection of an ordinance setting out the district. In all such municipalities requiring two (2) or more readings before passage of an ordinance, all readings shall have been held prior to the public hearing, except the final such reading, so that the adoption may take place at the conclusion of such public hearing.

Any person who fails to file a protest, who fails to appear at the public hearing to protest, or, having filed, withdraws such protest, shall be deemed to have waived any objection to the creation of the district, the making or acquisition of the improvements, and the inclusion of such person's property in the district. Such waiver, however, shall not preclude such person's right to object to the amount of the assessment at the hearing for which provision is made in § 7-84-409.

The governing body of any municipality may amend from time to time the ordinance organizing a central business improvement district to include additional improvements; provided, that the amendment shall not become effective until after a public hearing relating to the amendment is held in the manner required by § 7-84-204, and any amendment shall be subject to protest as provided in § 7-84-207.

Acts 1971, ch. 268, § 10; T.C.A., § 6-3910; Acts 2007, ch. 494, § 4.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2007, ch. 494, § 14 provided that the act shall apply to central business improvement districts already in existence and any districts that hereinafter may be created.

Cross-References. Ordinance creating district, contents, §7-84-208.

7-84-207. Failure of organization by resolution — Amendment of resolution — Rehearings.

In the event that such central business improvement district plan shall have been initiated by action of the governing body under § 7-84-202(2), such ordinance creating a central business improvement district shall not be adopted if written protests are filed with the governing body prior to the public hearing from owners representing more than one half (½) of the assessed value of all the property to be included in the district.

Failure of such ordinance by reason of protests having been filed by owners representing more than one half (½) of the assessed value of the property to be included in the district shall not bar the governing body from amending the district boundaries in such manner as to reduce the number of objectors to one half (½) or less of the assessed value of the district; provided, that a new public hearing shall be had on the amended district under the provisions hereinbefore established for such public hearings, and all of the procedures and provisions herein established shall be applicable to such second public hearing.

The governing body shall be permitted to amend the district boundaries only once in order to permit the adoption of such ordinance, and no petition shall be accepted nor resolution adopted by the governing body with respect to the same properties included in the original or amended proposed central business improvement district for a period of twelve (12) months following the failure of passage of such ordinance.

Acts 1971, ch. 268, § 11; T.C.A., § 6-3911.

7-84-208. Contents of ordinance creating district.

The ordinance adopted by the governing body of the municipality shall include:

A description of the district by metes and bounds;

A general description of the improvements to be constructed or established;

Authority for the employment of architects and engineers for the design of such central business improvement district, or adoption of a plan of improvements already drafted and prepared by some public or private agency or association, or both;

An estimate of the total cost of the improvements to be provided, including those to be furnished by the municipality;

Authorization of special assessments to be levied against the properties benefited by the improvements. The ordinance shall provide for the assessment of municipally-owned properties, if such determination is made by the governing body in accordance with §§ 7-84-405 and 7-84-406. If the municipality does not expect at the time of adoption of the ordinance that special assessments will be levied against any of the properties in the district, the ordinance may provide that no special assessments will be imposed at that time. If the municipality subsequently determines that special assessments in the district are required, the municipality may amend the ordinance to permit special assessments; provided, that the amendment shall not become effective until after a public hearing relating to the amendment is held in the manner required by § 7-84-204, and any amendment shall be subject to protest as provided in § 7-84-207;

Whether there shall be an allocation of the total costs of the improvement between the general revenues of the municipality and special assessments levied against the property owners, and what such allocation shall be;

The time and manner in which special assessments authorized by this chapter shall be paid; and

Create a board of assessment commissioners as provided in § 7-84-303 and appoint the members to the board; provided, that the appointment of members to such board may be by separate resolution of the governing body adopted at a later date, not less than six (6) months following the adoption of the ordinance provided in this chapter.

Notwithstanding subdivision (8)(A), if the municipality does not expect at the time of adoption of the ordinance that special assessments will be levied against any of the properties in the district, the creation of a board of assessment commissioners shall not be required until such time, if any, as the ordinance is amended to permit special assessments to be levied.

Acts 1971, ch. 268, § 12; T.C.A., § 6-3912; Acts 2007, ch. 494, §§ 5, 6.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2007, ch. 494, § 14 provided that the act shall apply to central business improvement districts already in existence and any districts that hereinafter may be created.

7-84-209. Creation of corridors to link central business districts.

The governing bodies of two (2) or more municipalities may enter into agreements to create a corridor to link together central business districts. A corridor of central business districts shall be subject to all this chapter relative to a single central business district.

Acts 2003, ch. 196, § 2.